Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 10

Derivative Actions

61-2-1001. Right to bring action.

A limited partner may bring an action in the court of record in the right of a limited partnership to recover judgment in its favor if general partners with authority to do so have refused to bring the action or if an effort to cause those general partners to bring the action is not likely to succeed.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

61-2-1002. Proper plaintiff.

In a derivative action the plaintiff must be a partner at the time of bringing the action and:

At the time of the transaction of which he complains; or

His status as a partner had devolved upon him by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the partnership agreement from a person who was a partner at the time of the transaction.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-1003. Complaint.

In a derivative action, the complaint shall set forth with particularity the effort, if any, of the plaintiff to secure initiation of the action by a general partner or the reasons for not making the effort.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-1004. Award of expenses.

If a derivative action is successful in whole or in part, or if anything is received by the plaintiff as a result of a judgment, compromise or settlement of any such action, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees. If anything is so received by the plaintiff, the court shall make such award of plaintiff's expenses payable out of those proceeds and direct plaintiff to remit to the limited partnership the remainder thereof, and if those proceeds are insufficient to reimburse plaintiff's reasonable expenses, the court may direct that any such award of plaintiff's expenses or portion thereof be paid by the limited partnership.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.